Illinois, session 104th, SB3336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-117.7, 1-140.10, 1-140.11, 1-140.15, 61-145.001, 1-146, 1-158, 3-101, 3-102, 3-402, 6-102, 7-601, 711-208, 11-501, 11-1516, and 11-1517 and by adding Sections 81-106.1, 1-106.2, 1-117.6, 1-117.8, 1-117.9, 1-117.10, 91-125.11, 1-205.5, 1-213.7, 11-317, 11-1008.5, 11-1403.4, and 1011-1435 as follows: 11    (625 ILCS 5/1-106.1 new)12    Sec. 1-106.1. Bicycle lane. A restricted right-of-way that 13runs alongside a roadway and is designated for the exclusive 14or semi-exclusive use of bicycles with through travel by motor 15vehicles or pedestrians prohibited, but with vehicle parking 16and crossflows by pedestrians and motorists permitted. 17    (625 ILCS 5/1-106.2 new)18    Sec. 1-106.2. Bicycle path. A right-of-way that is 19completely separate from a highway that is designated for the 20exclusive use of bicycles and pedestrians with crossflows by 21motorists minimized.   SB3336 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    (625 ILCS 5/1-117.6 new)2    Sec. 1-117.6. Electric micromobility device. A 3light-weight, low-speed, electric-powered device primarily 4used for personal transportation and operated at speeds up to 528 miles per hour. "Electric micromobility device" includes 6electric skateboards, electric unicycles, low-speed electric 7scooters, and high-speed electric scooters. For purposes of 8this Code, an electric micromobility device shall be 9considered a motor vehicle. "Electric micromobility device" 10does not include an electric personal assistive mobility 11device or a toy vehicle. 12    (625 ILCS 5/1-117.7)13    Sec. 1-117.7. Electric personal assistive mobility device. 14A self-balancing 2 non-tandem wheeled device designed to 15transport only one person with an electric propulsion system 16that limits the maximum speed of the device to 15 miles per 17hour or less, including, but not limited to, products marketed 18under the brand names of "Segway" or "Hoverboard" and other 19similar self-balancing 2 non-tandem wheeled products. 20"Electric personal assistive mobility device" does not include 21an electric micromobility device.22(Source: P.A. 92-868, eff. 6-1-03.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/1-117.8 new)24    Sec. 1-117.8. Electric unicycle. A self-balancing   SB3336 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1one-wheeled device designed to transport only one person with 2an electric propulsion system. Except as may otherwise be 3provided in this Code and to the extent practicable, the 4provisions of Article XV of Chapter 11 that apply to bicycles 5shall also apply to electric unicycles. 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-117.9 new)7    Sec. 1-117.9. Electric skateboard. A skateboard powered by 8an electric motor. 9    (625 ILCS 5/1-117.10 new)10    Sec. 1-117.10. Electric bicycle. A bicycle with operable 11pedals and an electric motor. 12    (625 ILCS 5/1-125.11 new)13    Sec. 1-125.11. High-speed electric scooter. A device with 142 or 3 wheels, handlebars, and a floorboard that can be stood 15upon while riding, that is solely powered by an electric motor 16and human power, and whose maximum speed, with or without 17human propulsion, is more than 15 miles per hour. "High-speed 18electric scooter" does not include a moped or motor driven 19cycle. 20    (625 ILCS 5/1-140.10)21    Sec. 1-140.10. Low-speed electric bicycle. A bicycle 22equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of   SB3336 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1less than 750 watts that meets the requirements of one of the 2following classes: 3        (a) "Class 1 low-speed electric bicycle" means a 4    low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that 5    provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and 6    that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches 7    a speed of 20 miles per hour.8        (b) "Class 2 low-speed electric bicycle" means a 9    low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that may 10    be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and that is not 11    capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches a 12    speed of 20 miles per hour.13        (c) "Class 3 low-speed electric bicycle" means a 14    low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that 15    provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and 16    that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches 17    a speed of 28 miles per hour.18    A "low-speed electric bicycle" is not a moped or a motor 19driven cycle. Any electric bicycle that is not a low-speed 20electric bicycle shall be considered a motor driven cycle for 21purposes of this Code. 22(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/1-140.11)24    Sec. 1-140.11. Low-speed electric scooter. A device 25weighing less than 100 pounds, with 2 or 3 wheels, handlebars,   SB3336 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1and a floorboard that can be stood upon while riding, that is 2solely powered by an electric motor and human power, and whose 3maximum speed, with or without human propulsion, is no more 4than 15 10 miles per hour. "Low-speed electric scooter" does 5not include a moped or motor-driven cycle.6(Source: P.A. 103-899, eff. 8-9-24.) 7    (625 ILCS 5/1-140.15)8    Sec. 1-140.15. Low-speed gas bicycle. A 2-wheeled or 93-wheeled device with fully operable pedals and a gasoline 10motor of less than one horsepower or 15 cubic centimeter 11displacement that is operated at speeds of less than 28 20 12miles per hour. Any gas-powered bicycle that is not a 13low-speed gas bicycle shall be considered a motor driven cycle 14for purposes of this Code. 15(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.) 16    (625 ILCS 5/1-145.001)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-148)17    Sec. 1-145.001. Motor driven cycle. Every motorcycle, 18moped, and every motor scooter with an internal combustion 19engine of less than 150 cubic centimeter piston displacement, 20or an electric motor with a nominal power rating of greater 21than 750 watts but less than or equal to 8,000 watts, including 22motorized pedalcycles and every electric bicycle or 23gas-powered bicycle that is not a low-speed electric bicycle 24or low-speed gas bicycle.  SB3336 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1(Source: P.A. 90-89, eff. 1-1-98.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/1-146)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-146)3    Sec. 1-146. Motor vehicle. Every vehicle which is 4self-propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by 5electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not 6operated upon rails, except for vehicles moved solely by human 7power, motorized wheelchairs, low-speed electric bicycles, and 8low-speed gas bicycles. For this Code Act, motor vehicles are 9divided into two divisions:10    First Division: Those motor vehicles which are designed 11for the carrying of not more than 10 persons.12    Second Division: Those motor vehicles which are designed 13for carrying more than 10 persons, those motor vehicles 14designed or used for living quarters, those motor vehicles 15which are designed for pulling or carrying freight, cargo or 16implements of husbandry, and those motor vehicles of the First 17Division remodelled for use and used as motor vehicles of the 18Second Division.19(Source: P.A. 96-125, eff. 1-1-10.) 20    (625 ILCS 5/1-158)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-158)21    Sec. 1-158. Pedestrian. Any person afoot or wearing 22in-line speed skates or riding a non-motorized skateboard or 23operating a toy vehicle, including a person with a physical, 24hearing, or visual disability.  SB3336 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/1-205.5 new)3    Sec. 1-205.5. Toy vehicle. Any battery powered ride-on toy 4that (i) is designed to not exceed 10 miles per hour, (ii) 5includes any number of wheels or handlebars or a steering 6wheel, and a seat or platform, and (iii) is designed for 7children under 8 years of age, including, but not limited to, 8products marketed under the brand names of "Razor" or "Power 9Wheels" and other similar products. 10    (625 ILCS 5/1-213.7 new)11    Sec. 1-213.7. Unicycle. Every human-powered device with 12one wheel and operable pedals and a designated seat for the 13transportation of one person. Except as may otherwise be 14provided in this Code and to the extent practicable, the 15provisions of Article XV of Chapter 11 that apply to bicycles 16shall also apply to unicycles. 17    (625 ILCS 5/3-101)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-101)18    Sec. 3-101. Certificate of title required. 19    (a) Except as provided in Section 3-102, every owner of a 20vehicle which is in this State and for which no Illinois 21certificate of title has been issued by the Secretary of State 22shall make application to the Secretary of State for an 23Illinois certificate of title of the vehicle. Except as   SB3336 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1provided in Section 3-102, every owner of a vehicle, excluding 2vehicles acquired by insurance companies through a settlement 3of an insurance claim or by lienholders taking title through 4repossession, that is in this State for which no Illinois 5certificate of title has been issued by the Secretary of State 6and every owner of a vehicle that is in the State applying for 7a duplicate certificate of title or a corrected certificate of 8title, including a dealer lien release certificate of title, 9must make application to the Secretary of State for an 10Illinois duplicate certificate of title or corrected 11certificate of title. A certificate of title issued to any 12owner of a vehicle, excluding vehicles acquired by insurance 13companies through a settlement of an insurance claim or by 14lienholders taking title through repossession, in this State 15showing an Illinois address for the owner that has been issued 16by an entity other than the Secretary of State must be 17converted to an Illinois title before the owner can transfer 18ownership of the vehicle.19    Under no circumstances shall a dealer required to obtain 20an Illinois certificate of title pursuant to this Code be 21allowed to obtain an out-of-state certificate of title for 22purposes of a vehicle held for sale in this State by the 23dealer. Under no circumstances shall a dealer be allowed to 24obtain an out-of-state certificate of title in lieu of an 25Illinois-issued dealer lien release certificate of title when 26a dealer may have need of such title issuance. Nothing in this   SB3336 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1Section shall be construed so as to allow a dealer to acquire 2an out-of-state certificate of title in lieu of acquiring an 3Illinois certificate of title for purposes of a vehicle held 4for sale in this State by the dealer. 5    (b) Every owner of a motorcycle or motor driven cycle 6purchased new on and after January 1, 1980 shall make 7application to the Secretary of State for a certificate of 8title. However, if such cycle is not properly manufactured or 9equipped for general highway use pursuant to the provisions of 10this Act, it shall not be eligible for license registration, 11but shall be issued a distinctive certificate of title except 12as provided in Sections 3-102 and 3-110 of this Act.13    (b-5) Every owner of (i) a motor driven cycle that is 14powered by an electric motor with a nominal power rating of 15greater than 750 watts but less than or equal to 8,000 watts or 16(ii) a gas-powered bicycle capable of operating at speeds 17greater than 28 miles per hour, purchased new on and after 18January 1, 2027, shall make application to the Secretary of 19State for a certificate of title, as long as such motor driven 20cycle or gas-powered bicycle has a vehicle identification 21number with which it is associated before a certificate of 22title may be issued. However, if such motor driven cycle or 23gas-powered bicycle is not properly manufactured or equipped 24for general highway use under this Code, it shall not be 25eligible for registration, but shall be issued a distinctive 26certificate of title except as provided in Sections 3-102 and   SB3336 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b13-110. 2    (c) The Secretary of State shall not register or renew the 3registration of a vehicle unless a certificate of title has 4been issued by the Secretary of State to the owner or an 5application therefor has been delivered by the owner to the 6Secretary of State.7    (d) Every owner of an all-terrain vehicle or off-highway 8motorcycle purchased on or after January 1, 1998 shall make 9application to the Secretary of State for a certificate of 10title.11    (e) Every owner of a low-speed vehicle manufactured after 12January 1, 2010 shall make application to the Secretary of 13State for a certificate of title. 14(Source: P.A. 103-891, eff. 8-9-24.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/3-102)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-102)16    Sec. 3-102. Exclusions. No certificate of title need be 17obtained for:18        1. a vehicle owned by the State of Illinois; or a 19    vehicle owned by the United States unless it is registered 20    in this State;21        2. a vehicle owned by a manufacturer or dealer and 22    held for sale, even though incidentally moved on the 23    highway or used for purposes of testing or demonstration, 24    provided a dealer reassignment area is still available on 25    the manufacturer's certificate of origin or the Illinois   SB3336 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    title; or a vehicle used by a manufacturer solely for 2    testing;3        3. a vehicle owned by a non-resident of this State and 4    not required by law to be registered in this State;5        4. a motor vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate 6    transportation of persons or property for which a 7    currently effective certificate of title has been issued 8    in another State;9        5. a vehicle moved solely by animal power;10        6. an implement of husbandry;11        7. special mobile equipment;12        8. an apportionable trailer or an apportionable 13    semitrailer registered in the State prior to April 1, 14    1998;15        9. a manufactured home for which an affidavit of 16    affixation has been recorded pursuant to the Conveyance 17    and Encumbrance of Manufactured Homes as Real Property and 18    Severance Act unless with respect to the same manufactured 19    home there has been recorded an affidavit of severance 20    pursuant to that Act; 21        10. (blank); low-speed electric scooters. 22        11. electric micromobility devices. 23(Source: P.A. 103-899, eff. 8-9-24.) 24    (625 ILCS 5/3-402)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-402)25    Sec. 3-402. Vehicles subject to registration; exceptions.   SB3336 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    A. Exemptions and Policy. Every motor vehicle, trailer, 2semitrailer and pole trailer when driven or moved upon a 3highway shall be subject to the registration and certificate 4of title provisions of this Chapter except:5        (1) Any such vehicle driven or moved upon a highway in 6    conformance with the provisions of this Chapter relating 7    to manufacturers, transporters, dealers, lienholders or 8    nonresidents or under a temporary registration permit 9    issued by the Secretary of State;10        (2) Any implement of husbandry whether of a type 11    otherwise subject to registration hereunder or not which 12    is only incidentally operated or moved upon a highway, 13    which shall include a not-for-hire movement for the 14    purpose of delivering farm commodities to a place of first 15    processing or sale, or to a place of storage;16        (3) Any special mobile equipment as herein defined;17        (4) Any vehicle which is propelled exclusively by 18    electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires though 19    not operated upon rails;20        (5) Any vehicle which is equipped and used exclusively 21    as a pumper, ladder truck, rescue vehicle, searchlight 22    truck, or other fire apparatus, but not a vehicle of a type 23    which would otherwise be subject to registration as a 24    vehicle of the first division;25        (6) Any vehicle which is owned and operated by the 26    federal government and externally displays evidence of   SB3336 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    federal ownership. It is the policy of the State of 2    Illinois to promote and encourage the fullest use of its 3    highways and to enhance the flow of commerce thus 4    contributing to the economic, agricultural, industrial and 5    social growth and development of this State, by 6    authorizing the Secretary of State to negotiate and enter 7    into reciprocal or proportional agreements or arrangements 8    with other States, or to issue declarations setting forth 9    reciprocal exemptions, benefits and privileges with 10    respect to vehicles operated interstate which are properly 11    registered in this and other States, assuring nevertheless 12    proper registration of vehicles in Illinois as may be 13    required by this Code;14        (7) Any converter dolly or tow dolly which merely 15    serves as substitute wheels for another legally licensed 16    vehicle. A title may be issued on a voluntary basis to a 17    tow dolly upon receipt of the manufacturer's certificate 18    of origin or the bill of sale;19        (8) Any house trailer found to be an abandoned mobile 20    home under the Abandoned Mobile Home Act;21        (9) Any vehicle that is not properly registered or 22    does not have registration plates or digital registration 23    plates issued to the owner or operator affixed thereto, or 24    that does have registration plates or digital registration 25    plates issued to the owner or operator affixed thereto but 26    the plates are not appropriate for the weight of the   SB3336 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    vehicle, provided that this exemption shall apply only 2    while the vehicle is being transported or operated by a 3    towing service and has a third tow plate affixed to it;4        (10) (blank); Low-speed electric scooters. 5        (11) electric micromobility devices. 6    B. Reciprocity. Any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer or 7pole trailer need not be registered under this Code provided 8the same is operated interstate and in accordance with the 9following provisions and any rules and regulations promulgated 10pursuant thereto:11        (1) A nonresident owner, except as otherwise provided 12    in this Section, owning any foreign registered vehicle of 13    a type otherwise subject to registration hereunder, may 14    operate or permit the operation of such vehicle within 15    this State in interstate commerce without registering such 16    vehicle in, or paying any fees to, this State subject to 17    the condition that such vehicle at all times when operated 18    in this State is operated pursuant to a reciprocity 19    agreement, arrangement or declaration by this State, and 20    further subject to the condition that such vehicle at all 21    times when operated in this State is duly registered in, 22    and displays upon it, a valid registration card and 23    registration plate or plates or digital registration plate 24    or plates issued for such vehicle in the place of 25    residence of such owner and is issued and maintains in 26    such vehicle a valid Illinois reciprocity permit as   SB3336 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    required by the Secretary of State, and provided like 2    privileges are afforded to residents of this State by the 3    State of residence of such owner.4        Every nonresident including any foreign corporation 5    carrying on business within this State and owning and 6    regularly operating in such business any motor vehicle, 7    trailer or semitrailer within this State in intrastate 8    commerce, shall be required to register each such vehicle 9    and pay the same fees therefor as is required with 10    reference to like vehicles owned by residents of this 11    State.12        (2) Any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer and pole 13    trailer operated interstate need not be registered in this 14    State, provided:15            (a) that the vehicle is properly registered in 16        another State pursuant to law or to a reciprocity 17        agreement, arrangement or declaration; or18            (b) that such vehicle is part of a fleet of 19        vehicles owned or operated by the same person who 20        registers such fleet of vehicles pro rata among the 21        various States in which such fleet operates; or22            (c) that such vehicle is part of a fleet of 23        vehicles, a portion of which are registered with the 24        Secretary of State of Illinois in accordance with an 25        agreement or arrangement concurred in by the Secretary 26        of State of Illinois based on one or more of the   SB3336 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        following factors: ratio of miles in Illinois as 2        against total miles in all jurisdictions; situs or 3        base of a vehicle, or where it is principally garaged, 4        or from whence it is principally dispatched or where 5        the movements of such vehicle usually originate; situs 6        of the residence of the owner or operator thereof, or 7        of his principal office or offices, or of his places of 8        business; the routes traversed and whether regular or 9        irregular routes are traversed, and the jurisdictions 10        traversed and served; and such other factors as may be 11        deemed material by the Secretary and the motor vehicle 12        administrators of the other jurisdictions involved in 13        such apportionment. Such vehicles shall maintain 14        therein any reciprocity permit which may be required 15        by the Secretary of State pursuant to rules and 16        regulations which the Secretary of State may 17        promulgate in the administration of this Code, in the 18        public interest.19        (3)(a) In order to effectuate the purposes of this 20    Code, the Secretary of State of Illinois is empowered to 21    negotiate and execute written reciprocal agreements or 22    arrangements with the duly authorized representatives of 23    other jurisdictions, including States, districts, 24    territories and possessions of the United States, and 25    foreign states, provinces, or countries, granting to 26    owners or operators of vehicles duly registered or   SB3336 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    licensed in such other jurisdictions and for which 2    evidence of compliance is supplied, benefits, privileges 3    and exemption from the payment, wholly or partially, of 4    any taxes, fees or other charges imposed with respect to 5    the ownership or operation of such vehicles by the laws of 6    this State except the tax imposed by the Motor Fuel Tax 7    Law, approved March 25, 1929, as amended, and the tax 8    imposed by the Use Tax Act, approved July 14, 1955, as 9    amended.10        The Secretary of State may negotiate agreements or 11    arrangements as are in the best interests of this State 12    and the residents of this State pursuant to the policies 13    expressed in this Section taking into consideration the 14    reciprocal exemptions, benefits and privileges available 15    and accruing to residents of this State and vehicles 16    registered in this State.17        (b) Such reciprocal agreements or arrangements shall 18    provide that vehicles duly registered or licensed in this 19    State when operated upon the highways of such other 20    jurisdictions, shall receive exemptions, benefits and 21    privileges of a similar kind or to a similar degree as 22    extended to vehicles from such jurisdictions in this 23    State.24        (c) Such agreements or arrangements may also authorize 25    the apportionment of registration or licensing of fleets 26    of vehicles operated interstate, based on any or all of   SB3336 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    the following factors: ratio of miles in Illinois as 2    against total miles in all jurisdictions; situs or base of 3    a vehicle, or where it is principally garaged or from 4    whence it is principally dispatched or where the movements 5    of such vehicle usually originate; situs of the residence 6    of the owner or operator thereof, or of his principal 7    office or offices, or of his places of business; the 8    routes traversed and whether regular or irregular routes 9    are traversed, and the jurisdictions traversed and served; 10    and such other factors as may be deemed material by the 11    Secretary and the motor vehicle administrators of the 12    other jurisdictions involved in such apportionment, and 13    such vehicles shall likewise be entitled to reciprocal 14    exemptions, benefits and privileges.15        (d) Such agreements or arrangements shall also provide 16    that vehicles being operated in intrastate commerce in 17    Illinois shall comply with the registration and licensing 18    laws of this State, except that vehicles which are part of 19    an apportioned fleet may conduct an intrastate operation 20    incidental to their interstate operations. Any motor 21    vehicle properly registered and qualified under any 22    reciprocal agreement or arrangement under this Code and 23    not having a situs or base within Illinois may complete 24    the inbound movement of a trailer or semitrailer to an 25    Illinois destination that was brought into Illinois by a 26    motor vehicle also properly registered and qualified under   SB3336 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    this Code and not having a situs or base within Illinois, 2    or may complete an outbound movement of a trailer or 3    semitrailer to an out-of-state destination that was 4    originated in Illinois by a motor vehicle also properly 5    registered and qualified under this Code and not having a 6    situs or base in Illinois, only if the operator thereof 7    did not break bulk of the cargo laden in such inbound or 8    outbound trailer or semitrailer. Adding or unloading 9    intrastate cargo on such inbound or outbound trailer or 10    semitrailer shall be deemed as breaking bulk.11        (e) Such agreements or arrangements may also provide 12    for the determination of the proper State in which leased 13    vehicles shall be registered based on the factors set out 14    in subsection (c) above and for apportionment of 15    registration of fleets of leased vehicles by the lessee or 16    by the lessor who leases such vehicles to persons who are 17    not fleet operators.18        (f) Such agreements or arrangements may also include 19    reciprocal exemptions, benefits or privileges accruing 20    under The Illinois Driver Licensing Law or The Driver 21    License Compact.22        (4) The Secretary of State is further authorized to 23    examine the laws and requirements of other jurisdictions, 24    and, in the absence of a written agreement or arrangement, 25    to issue a written declaration of the extent and nature of 26    the exemptions, benefits and privileges accorded to   SB3336 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    vehicles of this State by such other jurisdictions, and 2    the extent and nature of reciprocal exemptions, benefits 3    and privileges thereby accorded by this State to the 4    vehicles of such other jurisdictions. A declaration by the 5    Secretary of State may include any, part or all reciprocal 6    exemptions, benefits and privileges or provisions as may 7    be included within an agreement or arrangement.8        (5) All agreements, arrangements, declarations and 9    amendments thereto, shall be in writing and become 10    effective when signed by the Secretary of State, and 11    copies of all such documents shall be available to the 12    public upon request.13        (6) The Secretary of State is further authorized to 14    require the display by foreign registered trucks, 15    truck-tractors and buses, entitled to reciprocal benefits, 16    exemptions or privileges hereunder, a reciprocity permit 17    for external display before any such reciprocal benefits, 18    exemptions or privileges are granted. The Secretary of 19    State shall provide suitable application forms for such 20    permit and shall promulgate and publish reasonable rules 21    and regulations for the administration and enforcement of 22    the provisions of this Code including a provision for 23    revocation of such permit as to any vehicle operated 24    wilfully in violation of the terms of any reciprocal 25    agreement, arrangement or declaration or in violation of 26    the Illinois Motor Carrier of Property Law, as amended.  SB3336 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        (7)(a) Upon the suspension, revocation or denial of 2    one or more of all reciprocal benefits, privileges and 3    exemptions existing pursuant to the terms and provisions 4    of this Code or by virtue of a reciprocal agreement or 5    arrangement or declaration thereunder; or, upon the 6    suspension, revocation or denial of a reciprocity permit; 7    or, upon any action or inaction of the Secretary in the 8    administration and enforcement of the provisions of this 9    Code, any person, resident or nonresident, so aggrieved, 10    may serve upon the Secretary, a petition in writing and 11    under oath, setting forth the grievance of the petitioner, 12    the grounds and basis for the relief sought, and all 13    necessary facts and particulars, and request an 14    administrative hearing thereon. Within 20 days, the 15    Secretary shall set a hearing date as early as practical. 16    The Secretary may, in his discretion, supply forms for 17    such a petition. The Secretary may require the payment of 18    a fee of not more than $50 for the filing of any petition, 19    motion, or request for hearing conducted pursuant to this 20    Section. These fees must be deposited into the Secretary 21    of State DUI Administration Fund, a special fund that is 22    hereby created in the State treasury, and, subject to 23    appropriation and as directed by the Secretary of State, 24    shall be used to fund the operation of the hearings 25    department of the Office of the Secretary of State and for 26    no other purpose. The Secretary shall establish by rule   SB3336 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    the amount and the procedures, terms, and conditions 2    relating to these fees.3        (b) The Secretary may likewise, in his discretion and 4    upon his own petition, order a hearing, when in his best 5    judgment, any person is not entitled to the reciprocal 6    benefits, privileges and exemptions existing pursuant to 7    the terms and provisions of this Code or under a 8    reciprocal agreement or arrangement or declaration 9    thereunder or that a vehicle owned or operated by such 10    person is improperly registered or licensed, or that an 11    Illinois resident has improperly registered or licensed a 12    vehicle in another jurisdiction for the purposes of 13    violating or avoiding the registration laws of this State.14        (c) The Secretary shall notify a petitioner or any 15    other person involved of such a hearing, by giving at 16    least 10 days notice, in writing, by U.S. Mail, Registered 17    or Certified, or by personal service, at the last known 18    address of such petitioner or person, specifying the time 19    and place of such hearing. Such hearing shall be held 20    before the Secretary, or any person as he may designate, 21    and unless the parties mutually agree to some other county 22    in Illinois, the hearing shall be held in the County of 23    Sangamon or the County of Cook. Appropriate records of the 24    hearing shall be kept, and the Secretary shall issue or 25    cause to be issued, his decision on the case, within 30 26    days after the close of such hearing or within 30 days   SB3336 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    after receipt of the transcript thereof, and a copy shall 2    likewise be served or mailed to the petitioner or person 3    involved.4        (d) The actions or inactions or determinations, or 5    findings and decisions upon an administrative hearing, of 6    the Secretary, shall be subject to judicial review in the 7    Circuit Court of the County of Sangamon or the County of 8    Cook, and the provisions of the Administrative Review Law, 9    and all amendments and modifications thereof and rules 10    adopted pursuant thereto, apply to and govern all such 11    reviewable matters.12        Any reciprocal agreements or arrangements entered into 13    by the Secretary of State or any declarations issued by 14    the Secretary of State pursuant to any law in effect prior 15    to the effective date of this Code are not hereby 16    abrogated, and such shall continue in force and effect 17    until amended pursuant to the provisions of this Code or 18    expire pursuant to the terms or provisions thereof.19    C. Vehicles purchased out-of-state. A resident of this 20State who purchases a vehicle in another state and transports 21the vehicle to Illinois shall apply for registration and 22certificate of title as soon as practicable, but in no event 23more than 45 days after the purchase of the vehicle. If an 24Illinois motorist who purchased a vehicle from an out-of-state 25licensed dealer is unable to meet the 45-day deadline due to a 26delay in paperwork from the seller, that motorist may obtain   SB3336 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1an Illinois temporary registration plate with: (i) proof of 2purchase; (ii) proof of meeting the Illinois driver's license 3or identification card requirement; and (iii) proof that 4Illinois title and registration fees have been paid. If fees 5have not been paid, the motorist may pay the fees in order to 6obtain the temporary registration plate. The owner of such a 7vehicle shall display any temporary permit or registration 8issued in accordance with Section 3-407. 9(Source: P.A. 103-209, eff. 1-1-24; 103-899, eff. 8-9-24; 10104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    (625 ILCS 5/6-102)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-102)12    Sec. 6-102. What persons are exempt. The following persons 13are exempt from the requirements of Section 6-101 and are not 14required to have an Illinois drivers license or permit if one 15or more of the following qualifying exemptions are met and 16apply:17        1. Any employee of the United States Government or any 18    member of the Armed Forces of the United States, while 19    operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to the United 20    States Government and being operated on official business 21    need not be licensed;22        2. A nonresident who has in his immediate possession a 23    valid license issued to him in his home state or country 24    may operate a motor vehicle for which he is licensed for 25    the period during which he is in this State;  SB3336 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        3. A nonresident and his spouse and children living 2    with him who is a student at a college or university in 3    Illinois who have a valid license issued by their home 4    State.5        4. A person operating a road machine temporarily upon 6    a highway or operating a farm tractor between the home 7    farm buildings and any adjacent or nearby farm land for 8    the exclusive purpose of conducting farm operations need 9    not be licensed as a driver.10        5. A resident of this State who has been serving as a 11    member or as a civilian employee of the Armed Forces of the 12    United States, or as a civilian employee of the United 13    States Department of Defense, outside the Continental 14    limits of the United States, for a period of 120 days 15    following his return to the continental limits of the 16    United States.17        6. A nonresident on active duty in the Armed Forces of 18    the United States who has a valid license issued by his 19    home state and such nonresident's spouse, and dependent 20    children and living with parents, who have a valid license 21    issued by their home state.22        7. A nonresident who becomes a resident of this State, 23    may for a period of the first 90 days of residence in 24    Illinois operate any motor vehicle which he was qualified 25    or licensed to drive by his home state or country so long 26    as he has in his possession, a valid and current license   SB3336 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    issued to him by his home state or country. Upon 2    expiration of such 90 day period, such new resident must 3    comply with the provisions of this Act and apply for an 4    Illinois license or permit.5        8. An engineer, conductor, brakeman, or any other 6    member of the crew of a locomotive or train being operated 7    upon rails, including operation on a railroad crossing 8    over a public street, road or highway. Such person is not 9    required to display a driver's license to any law 10    enforcement officer in connection with the operation of a 11    locomotive or train within this State.12        9. (Blank). Persons operating low-speed electric 13    scooters in accordance with Section 11-1518.14        10. Persons operating an electric micromobility 15    device. 16    The provisions of this Section granting exemption to any 17nonresident shall be operative to the same extent that the 18laws of the State or country of such nonresident grant like 19exemption to residents of this State.20    The Secretary of State may implement the exemption 21provisions of this Section by inclusion thereof in a 22reciprocity agreement, arrangement or declaration issued 23pursuant to this Act.24(Source: P.A. 103-899, eff. 8-9-24.) 25    (625 ILCS 5/7-601)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 7-601)  SB3336 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    Sec. 7-601. Required liability insurance policy. 2    (a) No person shall operate, register or maintain 3registration of, and no owner shall permit another person to 4operate, register or maintain registration of, a motor vehicle 5designed to be used on a public highway in this State unless 6the motor vehicle is covered by a liability insurance policy.7    The insurance policy shall be issued in amounts no less 8than the minimum amounts set for bodily injury or death and for 9destruction of property under Section 7-203 of this Code, and 10shall be issued in accordance with the requirements of 11Sections 143a and 143a-2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, as 12amended. No insurer other than an insurer authorized to do 13business in this State shall issue a policy pursuant to this 14Section for any vehicle subject to registration under this 15Code. Nothing herein shall deprive an insurer of any policy 16defense available at common law.17    (b) The following vehicles are exempt from the 18requirements of this Section:19        (1) vehicles subject to the provisions of Chapters 8 20    or 18a, Article III or Section 7-609 of Chapter 7, or 21    Sections 12-606 or 12-707.01 of Chapter 12 of this Code;22        (2) vehicles required to file proof of liability 23    insurance with the Illinois Commerce Commission;24        (3) vehicles covered by a certificate of 25    self-insurance under Section 7-502 of this Code;26        (4) vehicles owned by the United States, the State of   SB3336 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    Illinois, or any political subdivision, municipality or 2    local mass transit district;3        (5) implements of husbandry;4        (6) other vehicles complying with laws which require 5    them to be insured in amounts meeting or exceeding the 6    minimum amounts required under this Section; and7        (7) inoperable or stored vehicles that are not 8    operated, as defined by rules and regulations of the 9    Secretary; and .10        (8) electric micromobility devices. 11    (c) Every employee of a State agency, as that term is 12defined in the Illinois State Auditing Act, who is assigned a 13specific vehicle owned or leased by the State on an ongoing 14basis shall provide the certification described in this 15Section annually to the director or chief executive officer of 16his or her agency.17    The certification shall affirm that the employee is duly 18licensed to drive the assigned vehicle and that (i) the 19employee has liability insurance coverage extending to the 20employee when the assigned vehicle is used for other than 21official State business, or (ii) the employee has filed a bond 22with the Secretary of State as proof of financial 23responsibility, in an amount equal to, or in excess of the 24requirements stated within this Section. Upon request of the 25agency director or chief executive officer, the employee shall 26present evidence to support the certification.  SB3336 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    The certification shall be provided during the period July 21 through July 31 of each calendar year, or within 30 days of 3any new assignment of a vehicle on an ongoing basis, whichever 4is later.5    The employee's authorization to use the assigned vehicle 6shall automatically be rescinded upon:7        (1) the revocation or suspension of the license 8    required to drive the assigned vehicle;9        (2) the cancellation or termination for any reason of 10    the automobile liability insurance coverage as required in 11    item (c)(i); or12        (3) the termination of the bond filed with the 13    Secretary of State.14    All State employees providing the required certification 15shall immediately notify the agency director or chief 16executive officer in the event any of these actions occur.17    All peace officers employed by a State agency who are 18primarily responsible for prevention and detection of crime 19and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws 20of this State, and prohibited by agency rule or policy to use 21an assigned vehicle owned or leased by the State for regular 22personal or off-duty use, are exempt from the requirements of 23this Section.24    (d) No person shall operate a motor vehicle registered in 25another state upon the highways of this State unless the 26vehicle is covered by a liability insurance policy. The   SB3336 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1operator of the vehicle shall carry within the vehicle 2evidence of the insurance.3(Source: P.A. 100-202, eff. 1-1-18; 100-828, eff. 1-1-19.) 4    (625 ILCS 5/11-208)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-208)5    Sec. 11-208. Powers of local authorities. 6    (a) The provisions of this Code shall not be deemed to 7prevent local authorities with respect to streets and highways 8under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of 9the police power from:10        1. Regulating the standing or parking of vehicles, 11    except as limited by Sections 11-1306 and 11-1307 of this 12    Act;13        2. Regulating traffic by means of police officers or 14    traffic control signals;15        3. Regulating or prohibiting processions or 16    assemblages on the highways; and certifying persons to 17    control traffic for processions or assemblages;18        4. Designating particular highways as one-way highways 19    and requiring that all vehicles thereon be moved in one 20    specific direction;21        5. Regulating the speed of vehicles in public parks 22    subject to the limitations set forth in Section 11-604;23        6. Designating any highway as a through highway, as 24    authorized in Section 11-302, and requiring that all 25    vehicles stop before entering or crossing the same or   SB3336 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    designating any intersection as a stop intersection or a 2    yield right-of-way intersection and requiring all vehicles 3    to stop or yield the right-of-way at one or more entrances 4    to such intersections;5        7. Restricting the use of highways as authorized in 6    Chapter 15;7        8. Regulating the operation of mobile carrying devices 8    and , bicycles, low-speed electric bicycles, and low-speed 9    gas bicycles, and requiring the registration and licensing 10    of same, including the requirement of a registration fee;11        9. Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles 12    or specified types of vehicles at intersections;13        10. Altering the speed limits as authorized in Section 14    11-604;15        11. Prohibiting U-turns;16        12. Prohibiting pedestrian crossings at other than 17    designated and marked crosswalks or at intersections;18        13. Prohibiting parking during snow removal operation;19        14. Imposing fines in accordance with Section 20    11-1301.3 as penalties for use of any parking place 21    reserved for persons with disabilities, as defined by 22    Section 1-159.1, or veterans with disabilities by any 23    person using a motor vehicle not bearing registration 24    plates specified in Section 11-1301.1 or a special decal 25    or device as defined in Section 11-1301.2 as evidence that 26    the vehicle is operated by or for a person with   SB3336 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    disabilities or a veteran with a disability;2        15. Adopting such other traffic regulations as are 3    specifically authorized by this Code; or4        16. Enforcing the provisions of subsection (f) of 5    Section 3-413 of this Code or a similar local ordinance.6    (b) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph 1, 74, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11 or 13 of subsection (a) shall be 8effective until signs giving reasonable notice of such local 9traffic regulations are posted.10    (c) The provisions of this Code shall not prevent any 11municipality having a population of 500,000 or more 12inhabitants from prohibiting any person from driving or 13operating any motor vehicle upon the roadways of such 14municipality with headlamps on high beam or bright.15    (d) The provisions of this Code shall not be deemed to 16prevent local authorities within the reasonable exercise of 17their police power from prohibiting, on private property, the 18unauthorized use of parking spaces reserved for persons with 19disabilities.20    (e) No unit of local government, including a home rule 21unit, may enact or enforce an ordinance that applies only to 22motorcycles if the principal purpose for that ordinance is to 23restrict the access of motorcycles to any highway or portion 24of a highway for which federal or State funds have been used 25for the planning, design, construction, or maintenance of that 26highway. No unit of local government, including a home rule   SB3336 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1unit, may enact an ordinance requiring motorcycle users to 2wear protective headgear. Nothing in this subsection (e) shall 3affect the authority of a unit of local government to regulate 4motorcycles for traffic control purposes or in accordance with 5Section 12-602 of this Code. No unit of local government, 6including a home rule unit, may regulate motorcycles in a 7manner inconsistent with this Code. This subsection (e) is a 8limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 9the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 10rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.11    (e-5) The City of Chicago may enact an ordinance providing 12for a noise monitoring system upon any portion of the roadway 13known as Lake Shore Drive. Twelve months after the 14installation of the noise monitoring system, and any time 15after the first report as the City deems necessary, the City of 16Chicago shall prepare a noise monitoring report with the data 17collected from the system and shall, upon request, make the 18report available to the public. For purposes of this 19subsection (e-5), "noise monitoring system" means an automated 20noise monitor capable of recording noise levels 24 hours per 21day and 365 days per year with computer equipment sufficient 22to process the data.23    (e-10) A unit of local government, including a home rule 24unit, may not enact an ordinance prohibiting the use of 25Automated Driving System equipped vehicles on its roadways. 26Nothing in this subsection (e-10) shall affect the authority   SB3336 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1of a unit of local government to regulate Automated Driving 2System equipped vehicles for traffic control purposes. No unit 3of local government, including a home rule unit, may regulate 4Automated Driving System equipped vehicles in a manner 5inconsistent with this Code. For purposes of this subsection 6(e-10), "Automated Driving System equipped vehicle" means any 7vehicle equipped with an Automated Driving System of hardware 8and software that are collectively capable of performing the 9entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless 10of whether it is limited to a specific operational domain. 11This subsection (e-10) is a limitation under subsection (i) of 12Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 13concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 14exercised by the State. 15    (f) A municipality or county designated in Section 1611-208.6 may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 17traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of this 18Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance and imposing 19liability on a registered owner or lessee of a vehicle used in 20such a violation.21    (g) A municipality or county, as provided in Section 2211-1201.1, may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 23traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of 24Section 11-1201 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 25ordinance and imposing liability on a registered owner of a 26vehicle used in such a violation.   SB3336 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    (h) A municipality designated in Section 11-208.8 may 2enact an ordinance providing for an automated speed 3enforcement system to enforce violations of Article VI of 4Chapter 11 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 5ordinance.6    (i) A municipality or county designated in Section 711-208.9 may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 8traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of 9Section 11-1414 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 10ordinance and imposing liability on a registered owner or 11lessee of a vehicle used in such a violation. 12(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18; 100-257, eff. 8-22-17; 13100-352, eff. 6-1-18; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-123, eff. 147-26-19.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-317 new)16    Sec. 11-317. Motor driven cycle prohibition signage. On 17any highway, bicycle lane, bicycle path, shared-use path, 18off-road bicycle trail or natural surface trail designated for 19bicycle use, or any other bicycle-specific facility 20established under State or local law for which use of motor 21driven cycles has been prohibited under Section 11-1403.4, the 22State or local government entity having jurisdiction shall 23erect permanent signage that notifies users that operation of 24motor driven cycles is strictly prohibited.   SB3336 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)2    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 3other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 4combination thereof. 5    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 6control of any vehicle within this State while:7        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 8    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 9    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 10    11-501.2;11        (2) under the influence of alcohol;12        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 13    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 14    renders the person incapable of driving safely;15        (4) under the influence of any other drug or 16    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person 17    incapable of safely driving;18        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other 19    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 20    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 21    driving;22        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 23    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 24    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 25    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 26    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating   SB3336 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 2    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 3    Control and Community Protection Act; or4        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 5    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 6    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 7    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 8    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 9    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 10    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 11    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 12    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 13    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 14    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 15    the use of cannabis.16    (a-5) The requirements of this Section also apply to 17low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed gas bicycles that 18are operated by a person who is under the influence of alcohol, 19other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 20combination thereof. 21    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this 22Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 23cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 24Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 25compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 26defense against any charge of violating this Section.  SB3336 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    (c) Penalties.2        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 3    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 4    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.5        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 6    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 7    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 8    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 9    administrative sanction.10        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 11    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 12    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 13    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 14    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.15        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 16    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 17    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on 18    the definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, 19    or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 20    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 21    mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community service and a 22    mandatory minimum fine of $500.23        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second 24    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 25    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 26    substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on the   SB3336 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 2    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 3    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 4    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 5    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250.6    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 7other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 8any combination thereof. 9        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 10    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 11    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 12    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 13    thereof if:14            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 15        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 16        time;17            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 18        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 19        passengers on board;20            (C) the person in committing a violation of 21        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 22        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 23        disability or disfigurement to another, when the 24        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;25            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 26        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating   SB3336 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 2        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 3        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 4        which the person was determined to have been under the 5        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 6        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 7        the offense or the person has previously been 8        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 9        of this paragraph (1);10            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 11        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 12        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per 13        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 14        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 15        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 16        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 17        to another person, when the violation of subsection 18        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;19            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 20        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 21        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft 22        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 23        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate 24        cause of the death;25            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 26        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving   SB3336 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 2        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 3        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 4        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 5        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 6        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;7            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 8        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 9        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 10        or a monitoring device driving permit;11            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 12        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or 13        she was driving was not covered by a liability 14        insurance policy;15            (J) the person in committing a violation of 16        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 17        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 18        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 19        transported by the person, if the violation was the 20        proximate cause of the injury; 21            (K) the person in committing a second violation of 22        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 23        a person under the age of 16; or24            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 25        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 26        passengers in a vehicle for-hire.   SB3336 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 2    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 3    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 4    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 5    4 felony.6        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 7    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 8    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 9    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 10    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 11    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 12    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum 13    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 14    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 15    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 16    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 17    days of community service in a program benefiting children 18    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 19    administrative sanction.20        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 21    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of 22    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 23    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 24    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 25    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 26    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section   SB3336 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 2    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 3    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 4    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 5    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 6    community service in a program benefiting children shall 7    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 8    administrative sanction.9        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 10    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 11    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 12    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 13    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 14    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 15    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 16    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 17    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 18    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 19    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 20    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 21    community service in a program benefiting children shall 22    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 23    administrative sanction.24        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 25    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 26    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the   SB3336 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 2    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 3    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 4    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 5    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 6    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 7    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 8    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 9    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 10    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 11    sanction.12        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph 13    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 14    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 15    than one year nor more than 12 years.16        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 17    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 18    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 19    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be 20    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 21    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted 22    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 23    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the 24    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons.25        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 26    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500,   SB3336 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 2    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 3    criminal or administrative sanction.4        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 5    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 6    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 7    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 8    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 9    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 10    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 11    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 12    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service 13    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 14    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.15        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 16    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 17    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be 18    imposed. 19        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who 20    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 21    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 22    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 23    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 24    other criminal or administrative sanction.25    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 26or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision   SB3336 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 2or an offense committed on a military installation that is 3similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.4    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 5assignment of community service for a violation of this 6Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.7    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 8has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 9this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 10any subsequent violation of subsection (a).11    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 12copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be 13admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 14(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-1008.5 new)16    Sec. 11-1008.5. Toy vehicles. Toy vehicles shall only be 17operated on sidewalks and paths designated for bicycles. Every 18person operating a toy vehicle upon a sidewalk or bicycle path 19shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all the 20duties applicable to a pedestrian. The driver of a vehicle 21shall yield the right-of-way to any person operating a toy 22vehicle. The use of toy vehicles on property owned, managed, 23or leased by any municipality, park district, forest preserve 24district, or conservation district is allowed, unless 25specifically prohibited in an ordinance or resolution adopted   SB3336 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1by the municipality, park district, forest preserve district, 2or conservation district. The Department of Natural Resources 3is authorized to adopt administrative rules for the regulation 4of toy vehicles on any and all properties owned, managed, or 5leased by the Department of Natural Resources. No person shall 6knowingly tamper with or modify the speed capability or 7engagement of a toy vehicle beyond the original speed 8capabilities of the device.9    No unit of local government, including a home rule unit, 10may regulate toy vehicles in a manner that is less restrictive 11than this Section. This paragraph is a limitation under 12subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 13Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 14powers and functions exercised by the State. 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-1403.4 new)16    Sec. 11-1403.4. Operation of motor driven cycles. 17    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a person 18may operate a motor driven cycle upon any public highway, 19street, or roadway in this State.20    (b) Motor driven cycles shall not be operated on any 21sidewalk, bicycle lane, bicycle path, shared-use path, 22off-road bicycle trail or natural surface trail designated for 23bicycle use, or any other bicycle-specific facility 24established under State or local law. For purposes of this 25subsection, "shared-use path" means any paved, off-street   SB3336 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1travel way designed to serve non-motorized vehicles and 2travelers.3    (c) Motor driven cycles shall not be operated upon 4interstate highways or upon public highways divided by a grass 5or concrete median or highways with speed limits in excess of 655 miles per hour or upon any public land where expressly 7prohibited by the State governing body, department, or agency 8having jurisdiction thereof.9    (d) No person shall operate a motor driven cycle unless 10that person is in possession of a valid driver's license. 11Pursuant to Section 6-107.1, the Secretary may issue an 12instruction permit to a person 16 or 17 years of age that 13entitles the holder to drive upon the highways during daylight 14under direct supervision of a licensed motor driven cycle 15operator 21 years of age or older who has a license 16classification to operate such motor driven cycle and at least 17one year of driving experience.18    (e) A person may not operate a motor driven cycle while 19carrying a passenger unless that motor driven cycle was 20manufactured to carry a passenger.21    (f) A motor driven cycle manufactured to accommodate 22passengers may not be operated by a person under the age of 18 23while transporting a passenger unless the passenger is a 24sibling, stepsibling, child, or stepchild of the operator.25    (g) Each motor driven cycle shall be equipped with a 26speedometer that displays the speed of travel in miles per   SB3336 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1hour. Each motor driven cycle shall also be equipped with or 2display a vehicle identification number and conform with all 3federal vehicle safety standards as well as meet all 4applicable equipment requirements specified in this Article 5and Chapter 12. No person shall knowingly tamper with or 6modify the speed capability or engagement of a motor driven 7cycle beyond its originally intended capability.8    (h) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, every 9person operating a motor driven cycle upon a highway shall be 10granted all of the rights allowed under this Chapter, and 11shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver 12of a vehicle by this Code, except as to any applicable special 13rules and those provisions of this Code which by their nature 14can have no application.15    (i) No retailer, wholesaler, distributor, or manufacturer 16shall market, advertise, label, or otherwise offer for sale a 17motor driven cycle in any manner that would reasonably cause a 18consumer to believe that the vehicle is a device that is not 19subject to the requirements of this Section. Any violation of 20this subsection constitutes an unlawful practice under the 21Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, and is 22enforceable by the Attorney General or State's Attorneys under 23the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. Law 24enforcement officers are authorized to seize or impound 25vehicles marketed or sold in violation of this subsection, 26pending resolution of proceedings initiated pursuant to the   SB3336 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. In 2addition to any penalty authorized under this subsection, the 3law enforcement agency may provide for the release of properly 4impounded vehicles and for the imposition of a reasonable 5administrative fee related to its confiscation and impounding. 6A retailer, wholesaler, distributor, or manufacturer that 7violates this subsection is subject to a civil penalty not 8exceeding $10,000 for each violation. Each mislabeled or 9falsely marketed vehicle constitutes a separate violation.10    (j) Any motor driven cycle found to be in violation of this 11Section may, in the discretion of the law enforcement agency 12having jurisdiction, be subject to confiscation and 13impoundment. The law enforcement agency may provide for the 14release of properly impounded vehicles and for the imposition 15of a reasonable administrative fee related to its confiscation 16and impounding. The administrative fee shall be waived upon 17verifiable proof that the vehicle was stolen or hijacked at 18the time the vehicle was impounded.19    (k) No unit of local government, including a home rule 20unit, may regulate motor driven cycles. This subsection (k) is 21a denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions 22under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 23Illinois Constitution, and is an exercise of exclusive State 24power which may not be exercised concurrently by a home rule 25unit.26    (l) Every owner of a motor driven cycle is subject to the   SB3336 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1mandatory insurance requirements specified in Article VI of 2Chapter 7 of this Code.3    (m) The Secretary may adopt any rules necessary to 4implement this Section. 5    (625 ILCS 5/11-1435 new)6    Sec. 11-1435. Operation of electric micromobility devices. 7    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a person 8may operate an electric micromobility device upon any highway, 9street, roadway, bicycle lane, or bicycle path in this State. 10A person operating an electric micromobility device upon a 11highway, street, or roadway may not otherwise impede or 12obstruct other vehicular traffic.13    (b) An electric micromobility device shall not be operated 14on:15        (1) a sidewalk;16        (2) a highway with a speed limit in excess of 35 miles 17    per hour, unless there is a designated bicycle lane on 18    such highway; or19        (3) an interstate highway.20    Additionally, any such electric micromobility device 21capable of and operating in excess of 28 miles per hour shall 22be prohibited from operating on any public highway, regardless 23of speed limit, and shall further be prohibited from bicycle 24lanes and bicycle paths.25    (c) The Department of Transportation and the Department of   SB3336 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1Natural Resources may adopt administrative rules prohibiting 2the use of electric micromobility devices upon any highway, 3street, roadway, bicycle lane, or bicycle path under its 4jurisdiction.5    (d) A person may not operate an electric micromobility 6device unless he or she is 16 years of age or older.7    (e) Every electric micromobility device shall be equipped 8with a functioning brake that will adequately control movement 9of and stop and hold the device. Every electric micromobility 10device, when in use at nighttime, shall also be equipped with a 11lamp on the front that emits a white light visible from a 12distance of at least 500 feet to the front and with a red 13reflector on the rear that is visible from all distances from 14100 feet to 600 feet to the rear when directly in front of 15lawful lower beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle, except 16that a lamp emitting a steady or flashing red light visible 17from a distance of 500 feet to the rear may be used in addition 18to or instead of the red reflector. A person operating an 19electric micromobility device at nighttime may also use a 20headlamp equipped with lighting sufficient to meet the 21visibility requirements of this subsection.22    (f) An electric micromobility device may be parked in the 23same manner and at the same locations as a bicycle may be 24parked; however, such device must not obstruct any sidewalk or 25pedestrian right-of-way.26    (g) A person may not use an electric micromobility device   SB3336 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1to carry a passenger unless the device was originally designed 2to carry more than one person at a time.3    (h) No person riding upon any electric micromobility 4device shall attach the device or himself or herself to any 5vehicle upon a roadway.6    (i) No person shall knowingly tamper with or modify the 7speed capability or engagement of an electric micromobility 8device beyond the original speed capability of the device.9    (j) A person may not operate an electric micromobility 10device while under the influence of alcohol or any drug.11    (k) Every electric micromobility device shall be 12well-maintained and in good operating condition.13    (l) An electric micromobility device shall not be equipped 14with a siren nor shall any person use any siren upon an 15electric micromobility device. This subsection does not apply 16to an electric micromobility device used by a police or fire 17department.18    (m) Any electric micromobility device operated in 19violation of or found to be in violation of this Section may, 20in the discretion of the law enforcement agency having 21jurisdiction, be subject to confiscation and impoundment. The 22law enforcement agency may provide for the release of a 23properly impounded vehicle and for the imposition of a 24reasonable administrative fee related to its confiscation and 25impounding. The administrative fee shall be waived upon 26verifiable proof that the vehicle was stolen or hijacked at   SB3336 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1the time the vehicle was impounded.2    (n) Every person operating an electric micromobility 3device upon a highway shall be granted all of the rights 4allowed by this Chapter, and shall be subject to all of the 5duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this Code, 6except as to any applicable special rules and those provisions 7of this Code which by their nature can have no application.8    (o) No unit of local government, including a home rule 9unit, may regulate electric micromobility devices. This 10subsection (o) is a denial and limitation of home rule powers 11and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII 12of the Illinois Constitution, and is an exercise of exclusive 13State power which may not be exercised concurrently by a home 14rule unit.15    (p) The Secretary may adopt any rules necessary to 16implement this Section. 17    (625 ILCS 5/11-1516)18    Sec. 11-1516. Low-speed gas bicycles.19    (a) A person may operate a low-speed gas bicycle only if 20the person is at least 16 years of age.21    (b) A person may not operate a low-speed gas bicycle at a 22speed greater than 28 20 miles per hour upon any highway, 23street, or roadway. 24    (c) A person may not operate a low-speed gas bicycle on a 25sidewalk.   SB3336 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 2provisions of this Article XV that apply to bicycles also 3apply to low-speed gas bicycles.4    (e) No unit of local government, including a home rule 5unit, may regulate low-speed gas bicycles. This subsection (e) 6is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions 7under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 8Illinois Constitution, and is an exercise of exclusive State 9power which may not be exercised concurrently by a home rule 10unit. 11(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/11-1517)13    Sec. 11-1517. Low-speed electric bicycles.14    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 15provisions of this Chapter that apply to bicycles also apply 16to low-speed electric bicycles.17    (b) Each low-speed electric bicycle operating in this 18State shall comply with equipment and manufacturing 19requirements adopted by the United States Consumer Product 20Safety Commission under 16 CFR 1512. Each Class 3 low-speed 21electric bicycle shall be equipped with a speedometer that 22displays the speed the bicycle is traveling in miles per hour.23    (c) Beginning on or after January 1, 2018, every 24manufacturer and distributor of low-speed electric bicycles 25shall apply a label that is permanently affixed to the bicycle   SB3336 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1in a prominent location. The label shall contain, in Arial 2font in at least 9-point type:3        (1) a classification number for the bicycle that 4    corresponds with a class under Section 1-140.10 of this 5    Code;6        (2) the bicycle's top assisted speed; and7        (3) the bicycle's motor wattage.8    No person shall knowingly tamper or modify the speed 9capability or engagement of a low-speed electric bicycle 10without replacing the label required under this subsection 11(c).12    (d) A Class 2 low-speed electric bicycle shall operate in 13a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to 14function when the brakes are applied. A Class 1 low-speed 15electric bicycle and a Class 3 low-speed electric bicycle 16shall operate in a manner so that the electric motor is 17disengaged or ceases to function when the rider stops 18pedaling. 19    (e) A person may operate a low-speed electric bicycle upon 20any highway, street, or roadway authorized for use by 21bicycles, including, but not limited to, bicycle lanes.22    (f) A person may operate a low-speed electric bicycle upon 23any bicycle path unless the State agency municipality, county, 24or local authority with jurisdiction prohibits the use of 25low-speed electric bicycles or a specific class of low-speed 26electric bicycles on that path. The Department of Natural   SB3336 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1Resources is authorized to adopt administrative rules for the 2regulation of low-speed electric bicycles on any and all 3properties owned, managed, or leased by the Department of 4Natural Resources. 5    (g) A person may not operate a low-speed electric bicycle 6on a sidewalk.7    (h) A person may operate a Class 1 or Class 2 low-speed 8electric bicycle only if he or she is 15 years of age or older. 9A person may operate a Class 3 low-speed electric bicycle only 10if he or she is 16 years of age or older. A person who is less 11than 16 years of age may ride as a passenger on a Class 3 12low-speed electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate 13passengers. A low-speed electric bicycle that is manufactured 14to accommodate passengers may not be operated by a person 15under the age of 18 with a passenger unless the passenger is a 16sibling, stepsibling, child, or stepchild of the operator.17    (i) No unit of local government, including a home rule 18unit, may regulate low-speed electric bicycles. This 19subsection (i) is a denial and limitation of home rule powers 20and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII 21of the Illinois Constitution, and is an exercise of exclusive 22State power which may not be exercised concurrently by a home 23rule unit. 24(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18.) 25    (625 ILCS 5/11-1518 rep.)  SB3336 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b1    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 2repealing Section 11-1518. 3    Section 15. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 4Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 5    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)6    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who 7knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 8Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the 9Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 10Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union 11Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 12Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 13Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 14Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 15Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 16Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 17the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe 18and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 19Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 20the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 21Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 22Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 23Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 24Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section   SB3336 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 20522 LNS 33996 b16-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115, 218d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 3Vehicle Code, subsection (i) of Section 11-1403.4 of the 4Illinois Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real 5Property Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, 6the Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental 7Health Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection 8Act, or the Student Online Personal Protection Act commits an 9unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.10(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 11100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132027.